tests/verbs-TAD.yaml
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 32) tv.aa.dir p2.sg":
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kpeshuwa
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kpeshuwaok
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : ktoskipeha
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : ktoskipehaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 31) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    notun<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : notunao
    notun<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : notunaok
    maehel<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : maehelao
    maehel<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : maehelaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 32) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : pweshuwao
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : pweshuwaok
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : toskipehao
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : toskipehaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 31) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    notun<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : notunawena
    notun<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : notunawenanak
    maehel<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nemaehelawena
    maehel<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nemaehelawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 32) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : mpeshuwawena
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : mpeshuwawenanak
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : ntoskipehawena
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : ntoskipehawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 31) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    notun<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : knotunawena
    notun<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : knotunawenanak
    maehel<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kemaehelawena
    maehel<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kemaehelawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 32) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kpeshuwawena
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kpeshuwawenanak
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : ktoskipehawena
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : ktoskipehawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 31) tv.aa.dir p2.pl":
    notun<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : knotunawa
    notun<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : knotunawaok
    maehel<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kemaehelawa
    maehel<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kemaehelawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 32) tv.aa.dir p2.pl":
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kpeshuwawa
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kpeshuwawaok
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : ktoskipehawa
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : ktoskipehawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 31) tv.aa.dir p3.pl":
    notun<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : notunawao #"notunawao" listed in book, but this might be an error
    maehel<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : maehelawoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 32) tv.aa.dir p3.pl":
    peshuw<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : pweshuwawoo
    toskipeh<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : toskipehawoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 33) tv.aa.dir p1.sg": 
    wihel<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : newihela
    wihel<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : newihelaok
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : nkwishelema
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : nkwishelemaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 34) tv.aa.dir p1.sg": 
    witaem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : newitaema
    witaem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : newitaemaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 33) tv.aa.dir p2.sg":
    wihel<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kwihela
    wihel<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kwihelaok
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kwishelema
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kwishelemaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 34) tv.aa.dir p2.sg":
    witaem<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kwitaema
    witaem<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kwitaemaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 33) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    wihel<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : wihelao
    wihel<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : wihelaok
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : kwishelemao
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : kwishelemaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 34) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    witaem<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : witaemao
    witeam<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : witaemaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 33) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    wihel<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : newihelawena
    wihel<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : newihelawenanak
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nkwishelemawena
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nkwishelemawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 34) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    witaem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : newitaemawena
    witeam<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : newitaemawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 33) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    wihel<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kwihelawena
    wihel<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kwihelawenanak
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kwishelemawena
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kwishelemawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 34) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    witeam<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kwitaemawena
    witeam<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kwitaemawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 33) tv.aa.dir p2.pl":
    wihel<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kwihelawa
    wihel<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kwihelawaok
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kwishelemawa
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kwishelemawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 34) tv.aa.dir p2.pl":
    witaem<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kwitaemawa
    witeam<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kwitaemawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 33) tv.aa.dir p3.pl":
    wihel<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : wihelawoo
    kwishelem<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : kwishelemawoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 34) tv.aa.dir p3.pl":
    witaem<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : witaemawoo
